Tennessee, session 114, SB0453.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-101-513(h)(3), is amended by
deleting "Prior to the commencement of each solicitation campaign" and substituting "Within
ninety (90) days after a solicitation campaign has been completed or within ninety (90) days
after the end of the fiscal year for a campaign that lasts more than one (1) year".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-101-513(h)(3), is amended by
deleting ", which is utilized in the campaign".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-101-513(h)(3), is amended by
deleting "Within seven (7) days after any modification or changes in campaign solicitation
literature or promotional materials utilized by the professional solicitor, the secretary of state
shall be notified in writing and be given samples or copies of such changes and modifications.".
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0453
000676
- 1 -